Vermont, session 2025-2026, S324.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Purpose and Findings * * *
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
(a) The purpose of this act is to actuate the principle of government
accountability by focusing on how evidence is used to inform policy, how our
State laws are carried out, and how legislation can best be formed to achieve its
intended outcomes. This act strives to systematize government accountability
efforts as much as possible with simple, clear, independent, objective, and fact-
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 2 of 10
based processes rather than rely upon individual legislators or individual
committees to be effective.
(b) Government accountability means the principle of demanding that
legislation succeeds in achieving its stated policy goals through the provision
of means by which to measure whether the policy goals have been met. The
metrics for determining whether success has been achieved are as important as
the goals themselves.
(c) Government oversight means the mechanisms put into place to ensure
that the bodies of government tasked with executing legislative intent are
properly doing so. Oversight by the General Assembly is the examination of
the processes followed and the information produced by government officials
executing the law to determine whether those officials are properly and
adequately achieving the policy goals established by the General Assembly.
* * * Creation of the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee * * *
Sec. 2. 2 V.S.A. chapter 28 is added to read:
CHAPTER 28. JOINT GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT AND
ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE
§ 971. CREATION OF COMMITTEE
(a) There is created the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee, whose membership shall be appointed each biennial session of the
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 3 of 10
General Assembly. The Committee shall work independently and with other
legislative committees to assist with matters related to government oversight
and issues of significant public concern.
(b) The Committee shall be composed of eight members: four members of
the House of Representatives, not more than two of whom shall be from the
same party, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and four members of the
Senate, not more than two of whom shall be from the same party, appointed by
the Committee on Committees. In addition to two members-at-large appointed
from each chamber, one appointment shall be made from each of the House
Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs, the Senate
Committee on Government Operations, and the House and Senate Committees
on Appropriations.
(c) The Committee shall elect a chair, vice chair, and clerk from among its
members and shall adopt rules of procedure. The position of chair shall rotate
biennially between the House and the Senate members. The Committee shall
keep minutes of its meetings and maintain a file thereof. A quorum shall
consist of five members.
(d) The Committee shall meet as necessary for the prompt discharge of its
duties.
(e) For attendance at a meeting when the General Assembly is not in
session, members of the Committee shall be entitled to compensation for
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 4 of 10
services and reimbursement of expenses as provided under subsection 23(a) of
this title.
(f) The professional and clerical services of the Joint Fiscal Office, the
Office of Legislative Operations, and the Office of Legislative Counsel shall
be available to the Committee.
§ 972. DUTIES AND POWERS
(a) Duties. The Committee shall have duties as described in this section
and elsewhere in law.
(1)(A) The Committee shall exercise government oversight by
examining and investigating matters of significant public concern relating to
State government performance. The Committee shall examine the possible
reasons for any failure of government oversight and provide findings and
tangible recommendations to standing committees of jurisdiction to prevent
future failures.
(B) The Committee will select issues of significant public concern to
examine and investigate by a majority of the current Committee members who
have not recused themselves from the matter. The Committee shall consider
issues of significant public concern referred to the Committee pursuant to a
resolution adopted by either chamber of the General Assembly.
(C) As used in this section, an “issue of significant public concern”
means any issue that:
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 5 of 10
(i) affects the State as a whole;
(ii) affects a vulnerable population;
(iii) costs the State more than $100,000,000.00;
(iv) implicates a serious failure of State government oversight or
accountability;
(v) arises from previously enacted legislation; or
(vi) constitutes a failure to adequately respond to State or federal
audits.
(2) The Committee shall, with coordination from the Legislative
Committee on Administrative Rules, evaluate executive entities directed to
adopt rules to ensure consistency and accountability in the rulemaking process.
(3) The Committee shall, on an annual basis, issue a report that includes:
(A) which issues of significant public concern the Committee has
examined and investigated, including relevant information and data;
(B) the Committee’s current objectives for review of issues of
significant public concern and which objectives, to date, have and have not
been met;
(C) the Committee’s objectives for review of issues of significant
public concern for the upcoming two years; and
(D) any additional resources required by the Committee to
adequately conduct its work.
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 6 of 10
(b) Powers. The Committee shall have powers as described in this section
and elsewhere in law.
(1) The Committee shall have the power to issue subpoenas and
administer oaths in connection with the examination and investigation of
matters of government oversight and accountability related to issues of
significant public concern.
(2) The Commission may take or cause depositions to be taken as
needed in any investigation or hearing.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 2311 is amended to read:
§ 2311. CHIEF PERFORMANCE OFFICER; ANNUAL STATE
OUTCOMES REPORT
* * *
(c) Approving population-level indicators.
(1) Annually, on or before March 1, a standing committee of the
General Assembly having jurisdiction over a population-level quality of life
outcome set forth in subsection (b) of this section or the Chief Performance
Officer may submit to the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee a request that any population-level indicator related to that outcome
be revised.
(2) If that request is approved by the Joint Government Oversight and
Accountability Committee, the Chief Performance Officer shall revise and
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 7 of 10
report on the population-level indicator in accordance with that approval and
this section.
(d) The report set forth in this section shall not be subject to the limitation
on the duration of agency reports set forth in 2 V.S.A. § 20(d).
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 163 is amended to read:
§ 163. DUTIES OF THE AUDITOR OF ACCOUNTS
In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, the Auditor of Accounts
shall:
* * *
(6)(A) Provide the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee with a written summary of all audits completed by the Office of the
Auditor of Accounts.
(B) Upon the request of the Joint Government Oversight and
Accountability Committee, provide, at the mutual convenience of the
Committee and Auditor, a presentation to the Committee of any completed
audit.
* * *
* * * Reports * * *
Sec. 5. 2 V.S.A. § 20 is amended to read:
§ 20. LIMITATION ON DISTRIBUTION AND DURATION OF AGENCY
REPORTS
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 8 of 10
(a) Unless otherwise provided by law, whenever it is required by statute,
rule, or otherwise that an agency, department, or other entity submit an annual,
biennial, or other periodic report to the General Assembly, that requirement
shall be met by submission by January November 15 of copies of the report for
activities in the preceding fiscal year to the Clerk of the House, the Secretary
of the Senate, the Office of Legislative Counsel Operations, chairs of
legislative standing committees of jurisdiction, and such individual members
of the General Assembly or committees that specifically request a copy of the
report. To the extent practicable, reports Reports shall also be placed
published on the agency’s Internet website. No general distribution or mailing
of such reports shall be made to members of the General Assembly.
* * *
(e) If it becomes apparent to any agency, department, or other entity
directed by the General Assembly to report on a matter that the agency,
department, or entity will be unable to do so within the required time, the
reporting agency, department, or entity shall inform, if applicable, the relevant
legislative committee’s current chair, the committee assistant, and the Office of
Legislative Operations of which report will be late, why, and when it will be
delivered.
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 9 of 10
* * * State-Funded Grants Review * * *
Sec. 6. RECOMMENDATIONS FOR STATE GRANT PROCESS
IMPROVEMENTS
(a) Performance review. The Agency of Administration shall review and
assess the performance of the State’s current grant-awarding procedures and
provide recommendations on how to improve such procedures in the form of a
written report to the General Assembly. In its report, the Agency shall:
(1) provide recommendations on how to:
(A) simplify the grant application and reporting processes;
(B) reduce the reliance on reimbursable grant agreements;
(C) increase the standard indirect rate and apply it consistently
statewide;
(D) reduce delays in the execution of grant awards and the issuance
of payments on grant agreements; and
(E) reduce work granted to nonprofit and community-based
organizations that could otherwise be done by the State;
(2) explain efforts to improve employee training on grant administration
across State government; and
(3) detail best practices and models of grant administration from other
states.
VT LEG #386878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.324
2026 Page 10 of 10
(b) Consultation. In furtherance of the review set forth in subsection (a) of
this section, the Agency shall consult with:
(1) relevant State agencies and departments;
(2) nonprofit and community-based organizations identified in
consultation with Common Good Vermont that have received a State-funded
grant; and
(3) other relevant stakeholders as determined by the Agency.
(c) Reporting. The Agency shall submit a written report to the House
Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate
Committee on Government Operations with its analysis conducted pursuant to
this section on or before December 15, 2026.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386878 v.1